Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 108
INDUSTRIAL BANKS

11-108-101 to 11-108-803. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article repealed, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1464, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 2003. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2013, consult the 2012 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.